Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB214.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2659YC (3) 91 da/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 214A.41 Definitions. 1 As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise 2 requires: 3 1. âFuel sourceâ means any of the following: 4 a. Any substance or combination of substances that is used 5 to power an internal combustion engine, including but not 6 limited to a biofuel, diesel fuel, gasoline, hydrogen, propane, 7 or a renewable fuel. 8 b. Any source of energy delivered or placed into the 9 battery or other energy storage device that is used to power 10 an electric motor. 11 2. âFuel-powered equipmentâ means any good subject to 12 a contract for sale under chapter 554, article 2, that is 13 manufactured to be operated with an engine or motor, regardless 14 of whether it is self-propelled. 15 3. âGovernment entityâ means any of the following: 16 a. A principal central department of the executive branch 17 as enumerated in section 7E.5, or a state authority, board, 18 commission, council, or independent agency that is not under 19 the direction of a principal central department as enumerated 20 in section 7E.5. 21 b. A political subdivision of the state, including but 22 not limited to a county as provided in chapter 331 or city as 23 provided in chapter 364. 24 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 214A.42 State and local regulation 25 governing fuel-powered equipment ââ prohibition. 26 A government entity shall not adopt or continue in effect 27 any regulation, including in the form of a rule, ordinance, or 28 resolution, that does any of the following: 29 1. Prohibits or restricts a person from possessing, 30 storing, transferring, acquiring, operating, maintaining, 31 repairing, or reusing fuel-powered equipment or parts of 32 fuel-powered equipment solely because such equipment is 33 manufactured to be powered by a specific fuel source. 34 2. Requires that a person selling fuel-powered equipment or 35 -1- LSB 2659YC (3) 91 da/ns 1/ 3 H.F. _____ parts of fuel-powered equipment do any of the following: 1 a. Sell fuel-powered equipment or parts of fuel-powered 2 equipment solely because such equipment is manufactured to be 3 powered by a specific fuel source. 4 b. Maintain an inventory of fuel-powered equipment or parts 5 of fuel-powered equipment solely because such equipment is 6 manufactured to be powered by a specific fuel source. 7 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 214A.43 State and local regulation 8 governing fuel-powered equipment ââ void. 9 Any regulation described in section 214A.42 is void and 10 unenforceable. 11 Sec. 4. Section 331.301, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 12 following new subsection: 13 NEW SUBSECTION . 27. A county shall not adopt or continue in 14 effect any regulation, including in the form of an ordinance 15 or resolution, that governs fuel-powered equipment as provided 16 in chapter 214A, subchapter IV. 17 Sec. 5. Section 364.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 18 following new subsection: 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 20. A city shall not adopt or continue in 20 effect any regulation, including in the form of an ordinance 21 or resolution, that governs fuel-powered equipment as provided 22 in chapter 214A, subchapter IV. 23 Sec. 6. DIRECTIONS TO CODE EDITOR. The Code editor is 24 directed to arrange the following sections in chapter 214A, as 25 enacted by this Act, into a new subchapter IV: 26 Sections 214A.41 through 214A.43. 27